Illinois, session 104th, HB4954.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 340B 5Drug Pricing Program Reporting Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act: 7    "340B covered entity" or "covered entity" means a covered 8entity, as defined in 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4), with a service 9address in Illinois as of January 1 of the reporting year. 10"340B covered entity" includes all entity types and grantees 11and all facilities that are identified as child sites or 12grantee associated sites under the federal 340B Drug Pricing 13Program. 14    "340B Drug Pricing Program" or "340B Program" means the 15drug discount program established under 42 U.S.C. 256b. 16    "340B entity type" means the designation of the 340B 17covered entity according to the entity types specified in 42 18U.S.C. 256b(a)(4). 19    "340B identification number" means the unique 20identification number provided by the Health Resources and 21Services Administration to identify a 340B-eligible entity in 22the 340B Office of Pharmacy Affairs Information System. 23    "Contract pharmacy" means a pharmacy with which a 340B   HB4954- 2 -LRB104 17048 BAB 30463 b1covered entity has an arrangement to dispense drugs purchased 2under the 340B Drug Pricing Program. 3    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.4    "Pharmaceutical manufacturer" means any entity that is 5engaged in: 6        (1) the production, preparation, propagation, 7    compounding, conversion, or processing of prescription 8    drug products, either directly or indirectly by extraction 9    from substances of natural origin, independently by means 10    of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction 11    and chemical synthesis; or12        (2) the packaging, repackaging, labeling, relabeling, 13    or distribution of prescription drug products. 14    "Pharmaceutical manufacturer" does not include a wholesale 15distributor of drugs or a retail pharmacy licensed under State 16law. 17    Section 10. Registration and reporting requirements. 18    (a) On or before April 1, 2027 and each April 1 thereafter, 19a 340B covered entity shall report the following information 20and transactions to the Department concerning the 340B covered 21entity's participation in or participation on behalf of the 22340B covered entity in the federal 340B Program for the 23previous calendar year: 24        (1) With respect to the 340B covered entity, the:25            (A) name;  HB4954- 3 -LRB104 17048 BAB 30463 b1            (B) service address; 2            (C) 340B Program identification number; and 3            (D) designation of entity type, as specified in 42 4        U.S.C. 256b(a)(4). 5        (2) The aggregate acquisition cost for all 6    prescription drugs obtained under the 340B Program and 7    dispensed or administered to patients. 8        (3) The aggregate payment amount received for all 9    drugs obtained under the 340B Program and dispensed or 10    administered to patients. 11        (4) The aggregate payment made to contract pharmacies 12    to dispense drugs obtained under the 340B Program. 13        (5) The number of claims for prescription drugs 14    described in paragraph (3). 15        (6) How the 340B covered entity uses any savings from 16    participating in the 340B Program, including the amount of 17    savings used for the provision of charity care, community 18    benefits, or a similar program of providing unreimbursed 19    or subsidized health care. 20        (7) The aggregate payments made to any other entity 21    that is not a 340B covered entity and is not a contract 22    pharmacy as described in paragraph (4) for managing any 23    aspect of the 340B covered entity's 340B Program. 24        (8) The aggregate payment made for any other 25    administering expense for the 340B Program. 26        (9) The aggregate number of prescription drugs   HB4954- 4 -LRB104 17048 BAB 30463 b1    dispensed or administered to patients for which a payment 2    was reported under paragraph (3). 3        (10) The percentage of the 340B covered entity's 4    claims that were for prescription drugs obtained under the 5    340B Program. 6        (11) The number and percentage of low-income patients 7    of the 340B covered entity that were served by a sliding 8    fee scale for a prescription drug dispensed or 9    administered under the 340B Program. 10        (12) The 340B covered entity's total operating costs. 11        (13) The 340B covered entity's total costs for charity 12    care. 13        (14) A copy of the 340B covered entity's financial 14    assistance policy for the reporting year. 15    (b) The information required to be reported under 16paragraphs (3) through (5) of subsection (a) must, to the 17extent feasible, be reported by payer type, including the 18following: 19        (1) Commercial. 20        (2) Medicaid. 21        (3) Medicare. 22        (4) Uninsured. 23    (c) The data submitted in the reports required under 24subsection (a) is confidential and is not available for public 25inspection. 26    (d) On or before November 15, 2027 and each November 15   HB4954- 5 -LRB104 17048 BAB 30463 b1thereafter, the Department shall: 2        (1) prepare a report that aggregates the data 3    submitted under subsection (a); 4        (2) submit the report to the General Assembly in an 5    electronic format; and 6        (3) post the report on the Department's website. 7    Section 15. Penalties. A 340B covered entity that fails to 8provide the information required under Section 10 by the date 9required shall pay to the Department a fine of $1,000 per day 10for which the information is past due. 11    Section 20. Exemptions for pharmaceutical manufacturers. 12    (a) Nothing in this Act shall deny, restrict, or prohibit 13a pharmaceutical manufacturer from obtaining the same data 14compiled and submitted by a 340B covered entity and provided 15to:16        (1) payors for reimbursement; or17        (2) any other entity managing any aspect of the 340B 18    covered entity's 340B Program, such as third-party 19    administrators.20    (b) Pharmaceutical manufacturers may use the compiled data 21for purposes of identifying and investigating duplicate 22discounts or diversion and verifying that a request made by a 23340B covered entity, its 340B contract pharmacy, or a location 24otherwise authorized by a 340B covered entity to receive 340B   HB4954- 6 -LRB104 17048 BAB 30463 b1drugs, pertains to a drug dispensed to a patient of that 340B 2covered entity. A pharmaceutical manufacturer may request that 3a 340B covered entity provide data that includes, without 4limitation, the following:5        (1) the date of service that the 340B drug was 6    dispensed;7        (2) the date that the 340B drug was prescribed;8        (3) the Rx number, also known as a prescription 9    number, which is a unique identifier that a pharmacy 10    assigns to each specific prescription filled or provided 11    for a patient;12        (4) the fill number for each 340B drug provided to a 13    patient, which shall indicate whether that specific 14    instance is the original or a subsequent fill of that 15    particular container;16        (5) the National Drug Code (NDC) number for the 340B 17    drug dispensed, as used by the United States Food and Drug 18    and published in the NDC Directory;19        (6) the quantity of the 340B drugs dispensed;20        (7) the appropriate prescriber ID or National Provider 21    Identifier (NPI), which shall be the unique number 22    identifying the health care provider who wrote the 340B 23    drug prescription;24        (8) the service provider ID or pharmacy/dispensing ID; 25        (9) the appropriate National Provider Identifier (NPI) 26    or the National Council for Prescription Drug Programs   HB4954- 7 -LRB104 17048 BAB 30463 b1    (NCPDP) provider ID for each filled prescription;2        (10) the pharmacy BIN (Bank Identification Number) 3    used to route electronic prescription claims to the 4    correct entities for dispensed 340B drugs; and5        (11) the Pharmacy Control Number (PCN) associated with 6    each fill or refill of a 340B drug. 7    Section 25. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 8to implement this Act. 9    Section 30. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 102031. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.